Hawaii statutes.
[§94-1.1] Definitions. For the
purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Disposition" means actions resulting
in the transfer to the state archives or destruction of records as documented
in the records retention and disposition schedule or other authority.

"Enduring value" means the continued
significance of records determined by their legal, fiscal, administrative, or
historical value that warrants their preservation by the state archives.

"Preservation" means a series of
managed activities necessary to protect machine readable records from loss,
alteration, deterioration, and technological obsolescence to ensure an accurate
rendering of those records in perpetuity in an environment independent from
that which produced them.

"Records" means information with
fixed form and content, regardless of physical form or characteristics, created
or received in the course of government activity and set aside as evidence of
that activity. In databases, "records" mean a collection of related
data fields.

"Records retention and disposition
schedule" means a records disposition authorization (form SA-1) or general
records schedule issued by the state comptroller, pursuant to section 94-3. [L
2013, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next